North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 4A. Charitable Remainder Trusts Administration Act.

§§ 36A-59.1 through 36A-59.7.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Article, former G.S. 36A-59.8 and 36A-59.9 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.